Missouri, session 2026, HB2606.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 191.220, to read as follows:
191.220. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "De-identified data" or "limited data set", information that has been
stripped of direct patient identifiers as described in 45 CFR 164.514;
(2) "Health care provider", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(3) "Health records", any information, in any form, that relates to the past,
present, or future physical or mental health or condition of a patient;
(4) "Informed consent", a signed and dated written authorization by the patient,
or the patient's legally authorized representative, specifying the purpose, scope, and
recipients of the information being disclosed;
(5) "Medical emergency", any period of time in which:
(a) A patient is experiencing an emergency medical condition, as defined in
section 376.1350; and
(b) Neither the patient nor the patient's legally authorized representative is able
to provide informed consent for the disclosure of health records.
2. A patient retains ownership rights over the patient's health records. A health
care provider is the custodian of the records but shall not disclose, transmit, or use a
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2606 2
patient's health records without the patient's informed consent unless specifically
authorized by state law.
3. (1) A health care provider, or any person or entity receiving health records
from a health care provider, shall not release, disclose, or share a patient's health
records without:
(a) The informed consent of the patient or the patient's legally authorized
representative;
(b) Specific authorization in state law; or
(c) A documented representation from another health care provider holding a
valid informed consent under state law.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, a health care provider
may disclose a patient's health records during a medical emergency to the extent
necessary for the immediate care and treatment of the patient.
(3) A health care provider shall not condition treatment of a patient on the
patient's decision to grant or withhold consent for the release of the patient's health
records.
4. No patient health records, including any de-identified data or limited data
sets, shall be used for research purposes unless the patient has provided informed
consent specifically authorizing such use. Blanket consents and opt-out mechanisms
shall not satisfy this requirement.
5. (1) A patient whose rights under this section are violated may bring a civil
action for actual damages, injunctive relief, and reasonable attorney's fees and court
costs.
(2) A prevailing patient may also recover liquidated damages of no less than one
thousand dollars and up to ten thousand dollars for each occurrence of unauthorized
disclosure or failure to obtain proper informed consent.
✔